Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1082.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 16, to read: ARTICLE 16. PETTING ZOOS and animal encounter exhibits START_STATUTE36-799. Petting zoos; animal encounter exhibits; handwashing required; enclosures; signage; supervision; rulemaking authority; civil penalties A. Except as provided in subsection F of this section, this section applies to all petting zoos, animal encounter exhibits and similar operations, whether permanent or temporary, at which members of the public are allowed to touch or feed live animals. B. Operators of petting zoos, animal encounter exhibits and similar operations shall ensure that all persons wash their hands with soap and water or use a hand sanitizer immediately on leaving the area where the animals are accessible to the public. C. Each petting zoo, animal encounter exhibit and similar operation shall prominently display at all entrances and exits a sign containing the following statement in clear, legible lettering that are at least one inch in height: For the safety of all persons, participants must wash their hands on exiting. Persons may not eat or drink within the animal contact area and should not place their fingers or any other object in their mouths. D. Each petting zoo, animal encounter exhibit and similar operation shall maintain the animals in an enclosed or otherwise restricted area so that persons who have not entered through a designated entrance cannot pet, feed or otherwise physically contact the animals. E. Each petting zoo, animal encounter exhibit and similar operation shall ensure that: 1. At least one responsible adult supervisor is present in the animal contact area at all times during operation. 2. each Supervisor actively monitors compliance with the handwashing requirement of subsection B of this section and ensures that all exiting participants comply immediately on leaving the area where the animals are accessible to the public. F. The handwashing requirement prescribed in subsection B of this section does not apply to petting zoos, animal encounter exhibits and similar operations that are contracted for a single day at a private residence for a private event or party. The operator shall post the sign prescribed in subsection C of this section at a visible location at the event site, inform those running the event that it is recommended that guests wash or sanitize their hands and provide a handwashing or sanitizing station nearby. G. the department of health services may adopt rules to implement and enforce this section, including inspection authority and the imposition of a civil penalty not to exceed $100 per violation.END_STATUTE